District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-206.03

Emergency Shelter Family Services Program.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 603, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 11, 1988, D.C. Law 7-86, § 2(b), 35 DCR 140
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-204, § 6, 36 DCR 454
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 3, 37 DCR 4815
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 502(f), 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-192, § 3(b), 43 DCR 4285
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(a), 52 DCR 8113
1981 Ed., § 3-206.3.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2, 3(b) of Public Assistance Shelter Days Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-235, March 17, 2003, law notification 40 DCR 2227).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Emergency Assistance Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-24, July 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3830).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Public Assistance Shelter Days Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-333, December 18, 1992, 40 DCR 9).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834) and § 2(c) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-36, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1839), § 3(b) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-105, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4019), § 3(b) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-425, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6141), § 3(b) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-485, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 630), and § 3(b) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-42, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2091).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 502(f) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-204, the “Frigid Temperature Protection Amendment Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-123, June 2, 1989.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-86, the “Emergency Shelter Services for Families Reform Amendment Act of 1987” (4-101), see Mayor’s Order 90-148, October 31, 1990.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 3-16, the Day Care Policy Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 94-230, November 7, 1994.

Declaration of an Emergency With Respect to the Urgent Need to Provide Permanent Housing for the Homeless in the District of Columbia: See Mayor’s Order 89-204, September 8, 1989.

Emergency procurement to provide temporary housing for homeless families in the District of Columbia: See Mayor’s Order 91-68, May 6, 1991.

Mayor’s reports: Section 4 of Law 7-86 provided that within 180 days of March 11, 1988, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a written report describing specific plans and timetables for implementing the provisions of this act. The Mayor shall transmit to the Council an annual updated written report regarding the status of the Emergency Shelter Family Program.